vendor/swiftlatex/texmf-dist/doc/fonts/yannisgr/rgrhyph.tex
% 
% This is part of the rgr-package version 1.1
%      as of   March 2, 1990 Lille (France)
%
% Hyphenation patterns for modern greek language
% **********************************************
%
\patterns{%
.>a4
.>'a4
.>~a4
.<a4
.<'a4
.<~a4
.'a4
.>e4
.>'e4
.>~e4
.<e4
.<'e4
.<~e4
.'e4
.>h4
.>'h4
.>~h4
.<h4
.<'h4
.<~h4
.'h4
.>i4
.>'i4
.>~i4
.<i4
.<'i4
.<~i4
.'i4
.>o4
.>'o4
.>~o4
.<o4
.<'o4
.<~o4
.'o4
.<u4
.<'u4
.<~u4
.'u4
.>w4
.>'w4
.>~w4
.<w4
.<'w4
.<~w4
.'w4
a1
a2i
a2'i
a2~i
a2>i
a2>'i
a2>~i
a2<i
a2<'i
a2<~i
'a3i
a3"
a2u
a2'u
a2~u
a2>u
a2>'u
a2>~u
a2<u
a2<'u
a2<~u
'a3u
e1
e2i
e2'i
e2~i
e2>i
e2>'i
e2>~i
e2<i
e2<'i
e2<~i
'e3i
e3"
e2u
e2'u
e2~u
e2>u
e2>'u
e2>~u
e2<u
e2<'u
e2<~u
'e3u
h1
h2u
h2'u
h2~u
h2>u
h2>'u
h2>~u
h2<u
h2<'u
h2<~u
'h3u
h3"
i1
i2a
i2'a
i2~a
'i3a
~i3a
u2'a
i2e
i2'e
'i3e
~i3e
u2'e
i2o
i2'o
'i3o
~i3o
u2'o
i2w
i2'w
i2~w
'i3w
~i3w
u2'w
'4'
''4'
''4>
''4<
'''a4
''>a'4
''<a'4
''>~a4
''<~a4
'''e4
'''>e'4
'''<e'4
'''h4
''>h'4
''<h'4
''>~h4
''<~h4
'''i4
''>i'4
''<i'4
''>~i4
''<~i4
'''o4
''>o'4
''<o'4
'''u4
''>u'4
''<u'4
''>~u4
''<~u4
'''w4
''>w'4
''<w'4
''>~w4
''<~w4
o1
o2i
o2'i
o2~i
o2>i
o2>'i
o2>~i
o2<i
o2<'i
o2<~i
'o3i
o3"
o2u
o2'u
o2~u
o2>u
o2>'u
o2>~u
o2<u
o2<'u
o2<~u
'o3u
u1
u2i
u2'i
u2~i
u2>i
u2>'i
u2>~i
u2<i
u2<'i
u2<~i
u3"
w1
~a3i
~a3u
~h3u
a1b
a1g
a1d
a1z
a1j
a1k
a1l
a1m
a1n
a1x
a1p
a1r
a1s
a1t
a1f
a1q
a1y
e1b
e1g
e1d
e1z
e1j
e1k
e1l
e1m
e1n
e1x
e1p
e1r
e1s
e1t
e1f
e1q
e1y
h1b
h1g
h1d
h1z
h1j
h1k
h1l
h1m
h1n
h1x
h1p
h1r
h1s
h1t
h1f
h1q
h1y
i1b
i1g
i1d
i1z
i1j
i1k
i1l
i1m
i1n
i1x
i1p
i1r
i1s
i1t
i1f
i1q
i1y
o1b
o1g
o1d
o1z
o1j
o1k
o1l
o1m
o1n
o1x
o1p
o1r
o1s
o1t
o1f
o1q
o1y
u1b
u1g
u1d
u1z
u1j
u1k
u1l
u1m
u1n
u1x
u1p
u1r
u1s
u1t
u1f
u1q
u1y
w1b
w1g
w1d
w1z
w1j
w1k
w1l
w1m
w1n
w1x
w1p
w1r
w1s
w1t
w1f
w1q
w1y
2b1b
2b1z
2b1j
2b1k
2b1m
2b1n
2b1x
2b1s
2b1t
2b1f
2b1q
2b1y
2g1b
2g1g
2g1z
2g1j
2g1m
2g1x
2g1s
2g1t
2g1f
2g1q
2g1y
2d1b
2d1g
2d1d
2d1z
2d1j
2d1k
2d1l
2d1m
2d1n
2d1x
2d1p
2d1s
2d1t
2d1f
2d1q
2d1y
2z1b
2z1g
2z1d
2z1z
2z1j
2z1k
2z1l
2z1m
2z1n
2z1x
2z1p
2z1r
2z1s
2z1t
2z1f
2z1q
2z1y
2j1b
2j1g
2j1d
2j1z
2j1j
2j1k
2j1m
2j1n
2j1x
2j1p
2j1s
2j1t
2j1f
2j1q
2j1y
2k1b
2k1g
2k1d
2k1z
2k1j
2k1k
2k1m
2k1n
2k1x
2k1p
2k1s
2k1f
2k1q
2k1y
2l1b
2l1g
2l1d
2l1z
2l1j
2l1k
2l1l
2l1m
2l1n
2l1x
2l1p
2l1r
2l1s
2l1t
2l1f
2l1q
2l1y
2m1b
2m1g
2m1d
2m1z
2m1j
2m1k
2m1l
2m1m
2m1x
2m1r
2m1s
2m1t
2m1f
2m1q
2m1y
2n1b
2n1g
2n1d
2n1z
2n1j
2n1k
2n1l
2n1m
2n1n
2n1x
2n1p
2n1r
2n1s
2n1f
2n1q
2n1y
2x1b
2x1g
2x1d
2x1z
2x1j
2x1k
2x1l
2x1m
2x1n
2x1x
2x1p
2x1r
2x1s
2x1t
2x1f
2x1q
2x1y
2p1b
2p1g
2p1d
2p1z
2p1j
2p1k
2p1m
2p1x
2p1p
2p1s
2p1f
2p1q
2p1y
2r1b
2r1g
2r1d
2r1z
2r1j
2r1k
2r1l
2r1m
2r1n
2r1x
2r1p
2r1r
2r1s
2r1t
2r1f
2r1q
2r1y
2s1b
2s1d
2s1z
sj2m
2s1l
2s1n
2s1x
2s1r
2s1s
2s1y
2t1b
2t1g
2t1d
2t1z
2t1j
2t1k
2t1l
2t1m
2t1n
2t1x
2t1p
2t1t
2t1f
2t1q
2t1y
2f1b
2f1g
2f1d
2f1z
2f1k
2f1m
2f1n
2f1x
2f1p
2f1s
2f1f
2f1y
2q1b
2q1g
2q1d
2q1z
2q1j
2q1k
2q1m
2q1n
2q1x
2q1p
2q1s
2q1f
2q1q
2q1y
2y1b
2y1g
2y1d
2y1z
2y1j
2y1k
2y1l
2y1m
2y1n
2y1x
2y1p
2y1r
2y1s
2y1t
2y1f
2y1q
2y1y
a1"'i
e1"'i
o1"'i
a1"'u
e1"'u
o1"'u
h1"'u
a1"~1
e1"~i
o1"~i
a1"~u
e1"~u
o1"~u
h1"~u
4'a.
4~a.
4'e.
4~e.
4'h.
4~h.
4'i.
4~i.
4'u.
4~u.
4'o.
4~o.
4'w.
4~w.
4'aa.
4'ab.
4'ag.
4'ad.
4'ae.
4'az.
4'ah.
4'aj.
4'ai.
4'ak.
4'al.
4'am.
4'an.
4'ax.
4'ao.
4'ap.
4'ar.
4'ac.
4'at.
4'au.
4'af.
4'aq.
4'ay.
4'aw.
4'ea.
4'eb.
4'eg.
4'ed.
4'ee.
4'ez.
4'eh.
4'ej.
4'ei.
4'ek.
4'el.
4'em.
4'en.
4'ex.
4'eo.
4'ep.
4'er.
4'ec.
4'et.
4'eu.
4'ef.
4'eq.
4'ey.
4'ew.
4'ha.
4'hb.
4'hg.
4'hd.
4'he.
4'hz.
4'hh.
4'hj.
4'hi.
4'hk.
4'hl.
4'hm.
4'hn.
4'hx.
4'ho.
4'hp.
4'hr.
4'hc.
4'ht.
4'hu.
4'hf.
4'hq.
4'hy.
4'hw.
4'ia.
4'ib.
4'ig.
4'id.
4'ie.
4'iz.
4'ih.
4'ij.
4'ii.
4'ik.
4'il.
4'im.
4'in.
4'ix.
4'io.
4'ip.
4'ir.
4'ic.
4'it.
4'iu.
4'if.
4'iq.
4'iy.
4'iw.
4'oa.
4'ob.
4'og.
4'od.
4'oe.
4'oz.
4'oh.
4'oj.
4'oi.
4'ok.
4'ol.
4'om.
4'on.
4'ox.
4'oo.
4'op.
4'or.
4'oc.
4'ot.
4'ou.
4'of.
4'oq.
4'oy.
4'ow.
4'ua.
4'ub.
4'ug.
4'ud.
4'ue.
4'uz.
4'uh.
4'uj.
4'ui.
4'uk.
4'ul.
4'um.
4'un.
4'ux.
4'uo.
4'up.
4'ur.
4'uc.
4'ut.
4'uu.
4'uf.
4'uq.
4'uy.
4'uw.
4'wa.
4'wb.
4'wg.
4'wd.
4'we.
4'wz.
4'wh.
4'wj.
4'wi.
4'wk.
4'wl.
4'wm.
4'wn.
4'wx.
4'wo.
4'wp.
4'wr.
4'wc.
4'wt.
4'wu.
4'wf.
4'wq.
4'wy.
4'ww.
4~aa.
4~ab.
4~ag.
4~ad.
4~ae.
4~az.
4~ah.
4~aj.
4~ai.
4~ak.
4~al.
4~am.
4~an.
4~ax.
4~ao.
4~ap.
4~ar.
4~ac.
4~at.
4~au.
4~af.
4~aq.
4~ay.
4~aw.
4~ha.
4~hb.
4~hg.
4~hd.
4~he.
4~hz.
4~hh.
4~hj.
4~hi.
4~hk.
4~hl.
4~hm.
4~hn.
4~hx.
4~ho.
4~hp.
4~hr.
4~hc.
4~ht.
4~hu.
4~hf.
4~hq.
4~hy.
4~hw.
4~ia.
4~ib.
4~ig.
4~id.
4~ie.
4~iz.
4~ih.
4~ij.
4~ii.
4~ik.
4~il.
4~im.
4~in.
4~ix.
4~io.
4~ip.
4~ir.
4~ic.
4~it.
4~iu.
4~if.
4~iq.
4~iy.
4~iw.
4~ua.
4~ub.
4~ug.
4~ud.
4~ue.
4~uz.
4~uh.
4~uj.
4~ui.
4~uk.
4~ul.
4~um.
4~un.
4~ux.
4~uo.
4~up.
4~ur.
4~uc.
4~ut.
4~uu.
4~uf.
4~uq.
4~uy.
4~uw.
4~wa.
4~wb.
4~wg.
4~wd.
4~we.
4~wz.
4~wh.
4~wj.
4~wi.
4~wk.
4~wl.
4~wm.
4~wn.
4~wx.
4~wo.
4~wp.
4~wr.
4~wc.
4~wt.
4~wu.
4~wf.
4~wq.
4~wy.
4~ww.
4a'a.
4b'a.
4g'a.
4d'a.
4e'a.
4z'a.
4h'a.
4j'a.
4i'a.
4k'a.
4l'a.
4m'a.
4n'a.
4x'a.
4o'a.
4p'a.
4r'a.
4s'a.
4t'a.
4u'a.
4f'a.
4q'a.
4y'a.
4w'a.
4a'e.
4b'e.
4g'e.
4d'e.
4e'e.
4z'e.
4h'e.
4j'e.
4i'e.
4k'e.
4l'e.
4m'e.
4n'e.
4x'e.
4o'e.
4p'e.
4r'e.
4s'e.
4t'e.
4u'e.
4f'e.
4q'e.
4y'e.
4w'e.
4a'h.
4b'h.
4g'h.
4d'h.
4e'h.
4z'h.
4h'h.
4j'h.
4i'h.
4k'h.
4l'h.
4m'h.
4n'h.
4x'h.
4o'h.
4p'h.
4r'h.
4s'h.
4t'h.
4u'h.
4f'h.
4q'h.
4y'h.
4w'h.
4a'i.
4b'i.
4g'i.
4d'i.
4e'i.
4z'i.
4h'i.
4j'i.
4i'i.
4k'i.
4l'i.
4m'i.
4n'i.
4x'i.
4o'i.
4p'i.
4r'i.
4s'i.
4t'i.
4u'i.
4f'i.
4q'i.
4y'i.
4w'i.
4a'o.
4b'o.
4g'o.
4d'o.
4e'o.
4z'o.
4h'o.
4j'o.
4i'o.
4k'o.
4l'o.
4m'o.
4n'o.
4x'o.
4o'o.
4p'o.
4r'o.
4s'o.
4t'o.
4u'o.
4f'o.
4q'o.
4y'o.
4w'o.
4a'u.
4b'u.
4g'u.
4d'u.
4e'u.
4z'u.
4h'u.
4j'u.
4i'u.
4k'u.
4l'u.
4m'u.
4n'u.
4x'u.
4o'u.
4p'u.
4r'u.
4s'u.
4t'u.
4u'u.
4f'u.
4q'u.
4y'u.
4w'u.
4a'w.
4b'w.
4g'w.
4d'w.
4e'w.
4z'w.
4h'w.
4j'w.
4i'w.
4k'w.
4l'w.
4m'w.
4n'w.
4x'w.
4o'w.
4p'w.
4r'w.
4s'w.
4t'w.
4u'w.
4f'w.
4q'w.
4y'w.
4w'w.
4a~a.
4b~a.
4g~a.
4d~a.
4e~a.
4z~a.
4h~a.
4j~a.
4i~a.
4k~a.
4l~a.
4m~a.
4n~a.
4x~a.
4o~a.
4p~a.
4r~a.
4s~a.
4t~a.
4u~a.
4f~a.
4q~a.
4y~a.
4w~a.
4a~h.
4b~h.
4g~h.
4d~h.
4e~h.
4z~h.
4h~h.
4j~h.
4i~h.
4k~h.
4l~h.
4m~h.
4n~h.
4x~h.
4o~h.
4p~h.
4r~h.
4s~h.
4t~h.
4u~h.
4f~h.
4q~h.
4y~h.
4w~h.
4a~i.
4b~i.
4g~i.
4d~i.
4e~i.
4z~i.
4h~i.
4j~i.
4i~i.
4k~i.
4l~i.
4m~i.
4n~i.
4x~i.
4o~i.
4p~i.
4r~i.
4s~i.
4t~i.
4u~i.
4f~i.
4q~i.
4y~i.
4w~i.
4a~u.
4b~u.
4g~u.
4d~u.
4e~u.
4z~u.
4h~u.
4j~u.
4i~u.
4k~u.
4l~u.
4m~u.
4n~u.
4x~u.
4o~u.
4p~u.
4r~u.
4s~u.
4t~u.
4u~u.
4f~u.
4q~u.
4y~u.
4w~u.
4a~w.
4b~w.
4g~w.
4d~w.
4e~w.
4z~w.
4h~w.
4j~w.
4i~w.
4k~w.
4l~w.
4m~w.
4n~w.
4x~w.
4o~w.
4p~w.
4r~w.
4s~w.
4t~w.
4u~w.
4f~w.
4q~w.
4y~w.
4w~w.
}
\endinput
 
